Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Article 3. Hazing

§ 570i.
Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Educational institution” means a Vermont public or independent school or a postsecondary school that offers or operates a program of college or professional education for credit or a degree in Vermont.

“Organization” means a fraternity, sorority, athletic team, association, corporation, order, society, corps, cooperative, club, or other similar group, whose members primarily are students at an educational institution, and that is affiliated with the educational institution.

“Pledging” means any action or activity related to becoming a member of an organization.

“Student” means any person who:

is registered in or in attendance at an educational institution;

has been accepted for admission at the educational institution where the hazing incident occurs; or

intends to attend an educational institution during any of its regular sessions after an official academic break.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 120

(Adj. Sess.), § 9; amended

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 78, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 570j.
Unlawful conduct.

For purposes of this subchapter, “hazing” means any intentional, knowing, or reckless act committed by a student, whether individually or in concert with others, against another student:

in connection with pledging, being initiated into, affiliating with, holding office in, or maintaining membership in any organization that is affiliated with the educational institution; and

that is intended to have the effect of, or should reasonably be expected to have the effect of, endangering the mental or physical health of the student.

Hazing shall not include any activity or conduct that furthers legitimate curricular, extracurricular, or military training program goals, provided that:

the goals are approved by the educational institution; and

the activity or conduct furthers the goals in a manner that is appropriate, contemplated by the educational institution, and normal and customary for similar programs at other educational institutions.

It shall be unlawful to:

engage in hazing;

solicit, direct, aid, or attempt to aid, or abet another person engaged in hazing; or

knowingly fail to take reasonable measures within the scope of the person’s authority to prevent hazing.

It is not a defense in an action under this subchapter that the person against whom the hazing was directed consented to or acquiesced in the hazing activity.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 120

(Adj. Sess.), § 9; amended

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 79, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 570k.
Civil penalty; Judicial Bureau; waiver penalty.

A person who commits an unlawful act under this subchapter shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than $5,000.00.

Any law enforcement officer may issue a summons and complaint for an act of hazing, which shall be heard by the Judicial Bureau pursuant to the procedures provided in 4 V.S.A. chapter 29.

The Court Administrator shall appoint a panel of Judicial Bureau hearing officers to establish a waiver penalty for an act of hazing.

Nothing in this section shall limit or affect the right of an educational institution to enforce its own penalties against hazing.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 120

(Adj. Sess.), § 9; amended

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 80, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 570l.
Criminal prosecution and civil action.

Nothing in this subchapter shall limit or preclude a criminal prosecution or any criminal or civil action based on any act that may constitute hazing.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 120

(Adj. Sess.), § 9; amended

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 81, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.